src/punct-kmr-lex.txt
LEXICON PunctRoot 
! Clause boundary symbols

%,+CLB:%,           # ;
%.+CLB:%.           # ;
%.%.+CLB:%.%.       # ;
%.%.%.+CLB:%.%.%.   # ;
%:+CLB:%:           # ;
%;+CLB:%;	        # ;
^excl+CLB:%!	    # ;	!^C^
!!! %?+CLB:%?	        # ;
!!! …+CLB:…		        # ;
!!! ¿+CLB:¿		        # ;	! Only seen as noise.
!!! ¶+CLB:¶		        # ;	
!!! 
!!! •+PUNCT:•	        # ;
!!! -+PUNCT:-           # ; !hyphen
!!! --+PUNCT:--         # ; !double hyphen
!!! –+PUNCT:–           # ; !endash
!!! —+PUNCT:—           # ; !emdash
!!! =+PUNCT:=           # ;
!!! %%+PUNCT:%%         # ;
!!! &+PUNCT:&           # ;
!!! %"+PUNCT:%"         # ;
!!! '+PUNCT:'           # ;
!!! %*+PUNCT:%*         # ;
!!! ++PUNCT:+           # ;
!!! `+PUNCT:`           # ;
!!! ´+PUNCT:´           # ;
!!! /+PUNCT:/           # ; 
!!! +/-+PUNCT:+/-       # ;
!!! %~+PUNCT:%~	        # ;
!!! 
!!! 
!!! ! Paired punctuation marks
!!! 
!!! %«+PUNCT+RIGHT:%«   # ;
!!! %»+PUNCT+LEFT:%»    # ;
!!! %“+PUNCT+LEFT:%“    # ;
!!! %”+PUNCT+RIGHT:%”   # ;
!!! %‘+PUNCT+LEFT:%‘    # ;
!!! %’+PUNCT+RIGHT:%’   # ;
!!! %‹+PUNCT+LEFT:%‹    # ;
!!! %›+PUNCT+RIGHT:%›   # ;
!!! %(+PUNCT+LEFT:%(    # ;
!!! %)+PUNCT+RIGHT:%)   # ;
!!! %[+PUNCT+LEFT:%[    # ;
!!! %]+PUNCT+RIGHT:%]   # ;
!!! %{+PUNCT+LEFT:%{    # ;
!!! %}+PUNCT+RIGHT:%}   # ;
!!! %<+PUNCT+LEFT:%<    # ;
!!! %>+PUNCT+LEFT:%>    # ;
!!! 
!!! 
